Wisconsin, session 2025, SB135.
do enact as follows:SB135,13Section 1. 118.02 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:SB135,1,44118.02 (3m) February 18, Vel R. Phillips’s birthday.SB135,25Section 2. Initial applicability.SB135,2,21(1) This act first applies to the school year beginning after the effective date of 2this subsection.SB135,2,33